apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="two__num">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>hundred</l>
        <r><b/>hundred<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>thousand</l>
        <r><b/>thousand<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="million__num">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="twenty__num">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r/>
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>-one</l>
        <r>-one</r>
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>-two</l>
        <r>-two</r>
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>-three</l>
        <r>-three</r>
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>-four</l>
        <r>-four</r>
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>-five</l>
        <r>-five</r>
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>-six</l>
        <r>-six</r>
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>-seven</l>
        <r>-seven</r>
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>-eight</l>
        <r>-eight</r>
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>-nine</l>
        <r>-nine</r>
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ha/ve__vbmod">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ve</l>
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ve</l>
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                             <e i="">
  <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
<p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ving</l>
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ving</l>
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ving</l>
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="want__vbmod">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="will/__vbmod">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

<pardef n="would/__vbmod">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="c/an__vbmod">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>an</l>
        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l>an</l>
        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ould</l>
        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/be_able_to__vbmod">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>be<b/>able<b/>to</l>
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>are<b/>able<b/>to</l>
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>am<b/>able<b/>to</l>
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>is<b/>able<b/>to</l>
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l>
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l>
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>were<b/>able<b/>to</l>
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>been<b/>able<b/>to</l>
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l>
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l>
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l>
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="a thousand" i=""><i>a<b/>thousand</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="a million" i=""><i>a<b/>million</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="a billion" i=""><i>a<b/>billion</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="a trillion" i=""><i>a<b/>trillion</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="one hundred" i=""><i>one<b/>hundred</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="one thousand" i=""><i>one<b/>thousand</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="one billion" i=""><i>one<b/>billion</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="million" i=""><i>million</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="trillion" i=""><i>trillion</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="four" i=""><i>four</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="two" i=""><i>two</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="seven" i=""><i>seven</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="ten" i=""><i>ten</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="twelve" i=""><i>twelve</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="fourteen" i=""><i>fourteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="sixteen" i=""><i>sixteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="eighteen" i=""><i>eighteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="thirty" i=""><i>thirty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="forty" i=""><i>forty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="fifty" i=""><i>fifty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="sixty" i=""><i>sixty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="seventy" i=""><i>seventy</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="eighty" i=""><i>eighty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="ninety" i=""><i>ninety</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="can" i=""><i>c</i><par n="c/an__vbmod"/></e>
                            <e r="RL" i=""><i/><par n="/be_able_to__vbmod"/></e>
                            <e lm="have to" i=""><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbmod"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="need to" i=""><i>need</i><par n="want__vbmod"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="want to" i=""><i>want</i><par n="want__vbmod"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="will" i=""><i>will</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
                            <e lm="shall" i=""><i>shall</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
                            <e lm="would" i=""><i>would</i><par n="would/__vbmod"/></e>
                            <e lm="must" i=""><i>must</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
                            <e lm="should" i=""><i>should</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
                            <e lm="may" i=""><i>may</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
                            <e lm="might" i=""><i>might</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
                            <e lm="a thousand" i=""><i>a<b/>thousand</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="a billion" i=""><i>a<b/>billion</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="one thousand" i=""><i>one<b/>thousand</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="one billion" i=""><i>one<b/>billion</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="billion" i=""><i>billion</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="eight" i=""><i>eight</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="four" i=""><i>four</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="two" i=""><i>two</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="seven" i=""><i>seven</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="ten" i=""><i>ten</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="twelve" i=""><i>twelve</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="sixteen" i=""><i>sixteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="twenty" i=""><i>twenty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="thirty" i=""><i>thirty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="forty" i=""><i>forty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="fifty" i=""><i>fifty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="sixty" i=""><i>sixty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="seventy" i=""><i>seventy</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="eighty" i=""><i>eighty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
